DI1-487

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DI1B8-08

DTC

B0107/51

Short in P Squib Circuit (to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The P squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and front passenger airbag assembly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.
DTC B0107/51 is recorded when ground short is detected in the P squib circuit.

« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction *Wire harness

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Short circuit in P squib wire harness (to ground) « Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib)
B0107/51 ¢ P squib malfunction « Airbag sensor assembly

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-480.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)
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2 [ Check P squib circuit.
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CHECK:
For the connector (on the front passenger airbag assembly
side) between the front passenger airbag assembly and the air-
bag sensor assembly, measure the resistance between P+ and
body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

tween front passenger airbag assembly and air-
bag sensor assembly.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector be-
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©)

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect P+ and P- of the connector
(on the front passenger airbag assembly side) between
the front passenger airbag assembly and the airbag sen-
sor assembly.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO 107/51 is notoutput.

Codesotherthancode B0 107/51 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 [ Check P squib.

P Squib
Airbag

C[D::l Sensor

:l Assembly

—_—

ACC ON

D,

Check Connector DTC B0107/51

H01024
AB0118 AB0119

R13006 H01075 HO01196

PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See step 5 on page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

OK:
DTCBO0 107/51 is not output.
HINT:
CodesotherthancodeBO 107/51 may be output atthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace front passenger airbag assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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